California statutes. Education Code
(6) Have a household income below the percentage of the federal poverty level, as adjusted annually by the federal government, applicable to the student, as specified in the following table, based on the status and size of the student’s household:

Student Household Status and SizePercentage of federal poverty level for Cal Grant 4 Program QualificationA dependent student with married parents and an independent student without a dependent275 percentA dependent student with a single parent325 percentAn independent, married student with a dependent350 percentAn independent, single student with a dependent400 percent

(c) The amount of the annual Cal Grant 4 award shall be based on the institution at which the recipient
 student is enrolled, in accordance with the following:

(1) For a student enrolled in a baccalaureate degree program at a California Community College, the amount determined under subdivision (b) of Section 69435.3, as it read on December 31, 2022.

(2) For a student enrolled at a campus of the University of California, the cost of tuition and mandatory systemwide fees.

(3) For a student enrolled at a campus of the California State University, the cost of tuition and mandatory systemwide fees.

(4) For a student enrolled at an independent institution of higher education, the amount determined pursuant to Section 69413.

(5) For a student enrolled at a for-profit institution accredited by the
 Western Association of Schools and Colleges (WASC), eight thousand fifty-six dollars ($8,056).

(6) For a student enrolled at a for-profit institution that is not accredited by WASC, four thousand dollars ($4,000).

(d) Any recipient of the Cal Grant 4 award is also eligible for an award pursuant to Sections 69465 and 69470, if they meet criteria described in those sections.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 54, Sec. 8.   (AB 183)   Effective June 30, 2022.   Conditionally operative by Sec. 65 of Stats. 2022, Ch. 54.   Conditionally operative as prescribed in Sections 69405 and 69428.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Operative Date [69428. - 69428.]

69428.

This chapter shall become operative for students to apply for Cal Grant 2 awards under Article 2 (commencing with Section 69424) and Cal Grant 4 awards under Article 3 (commencing with Section 69425) only if General Fund moneys over the multiyear forecasts beginning in the 2024–25 fiscal year are available to support ongoing augmentations and actions, and if funding is provided in the annual Budget Act to implement the Cal Grant Reform Act pursuant to this chapter. It is the intent of the Legislature that students eligible for Cal Grant 2 and Cal Grant 4 awards receive aid for the 2024–25 academic year.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 54, Sec. 8.   (AB 183)   Effective June 30, 2022.   Conditionally operative by Sec. 65 of Stats. 2022, Ch. 54.   Conditionally operative by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 1.7. Ortiz-Pacheco-Poochigian-Vasconcellos Cal Grant Program [69430. - 69475.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [69430. - 69433.9.]

69430.

This chapter shall be known, and may be cited, as the Ortiz-Pacheco-Poochigian-Vasconcellos Cal Grant Program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 403, Sec. 4.   Effective September 12, 2000.   Conditionally inoperative as prescribed in Section 69475 (if it becomes operative).   Repealed conditionally pursuant to Section 69475 (if it becomes operative).)
-------------------------------------------

69431.

There is hereby established the Ortiz-Pacheco-Poochigian-Vasconcellos Cal Grant Program, which may also be referred to as the Cal Grant Program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 403, Sec. 4.   Effective September 12, 2000.   Conditionally inoperative as prescribed in Section 69475 (if it becomes operative).   Repealed conditionally pursuant to Section 69475 (if it becomes operative).)
-------------------------------------------

69432.

(a) (1) Cal Grant Program awards shall be known as “Cal Grant A Entitlement Awards,” “Cal Grant B Entitlement Awards,” “California Community College Expanded Entitlement Awards,” “California Community College Transfer Entitlement Awards,” “Competitive Cal Grant A and B Awards,” “Cal Grant C Awards,” and “Cal Grant T Awards.”

(2) For purposes of this section, “associate degree for transfer commitment” means a commitment by an independent institution of higher education that chooses to accept the California Community College associate degree for transfer pursuant to Section 66749.6.

(b) Maximum award amounts for students at independent institutions of higher education, private
 for-profit postsecondary educational institutions, and for Cal Grant C and
 Cal Grant T awards shall be identified in the annual Budget Act. Maximum award amounts for Cal Grant A, B, and C awards for students attending public institutions shall be referenced in the annual Budget Act.

(c) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), and subdivision (c) of Section 66021.2, commencing with the 2013–14 award year, the maximum tuition award amounts for Cal Grant A and B awards for students attending private for-profit postsecondary educational institutions shall be four thousand dollars ($4,000).

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1) of this subdivision, subdivision (b) of this section, and subdivision (c) of
 Section 66021.2, commencing with the 2018–19 award year, the maximum tuition award amounts for Cal Grant A and B awards for students attending private for-profit postsecondary educational institutions accredited by the Western Association of Schools and Colleges shall be nine thousand eighty-four dollars ($9,084) for new recipients, unless otherwise specified in the Budget Act of 2018.

(d) Notwithstanding subdivision (b) of this section, and subdivision (c) of Section 66021.2, the maximum tuition award amounts for Cal Grant A and B awards for students attending independent institutions of higher education shall be as follows:

(1) For the 2015–16 to 2020–21 award years, inclusive, nine thousand eighty-four dollars ($9,084) for new recipients.

(2) For the 2021–22 award year, nine thousand two hundred twenty dollars
 ($9,220) for new recipients.

(3) For the 2022–23 and 2023–24 award years, nine thousand three hundred fifty-eight dollars ($9,358) for new recipients.

(4) For the 2024–25 award year and each year thereafter:

(A) If the number of new unduplicated transfer students accepted by independent institutions of higher education who have been given associate degree for transfer commitments in the prior award year meets or exceeds the target specified in subdivision (h), nine thousand three hundred fifty-eight dollars ($9,358) for new recipients.

(B) If the number of new unduplicated transfer students accepted by independent institutions of higher education who have been given associate degree for transfer commitments in the prior award year is less than the
 target specified in subdivision (h), eight thousand fifty-six dollars ($8,056) for new recipients.

(e) (1) The renewal award amount for a student whose initial award is subject to a maximum award amount specified in this section shall be calculated pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 69433.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1) of this subdivision, and paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 69433, the maximum tuition award amounts for Cal Grant A and B awards for students attending independent institutions of higher education shall be nine thousand three hundred fifty-eight dollars ($9,358) for renewal recipients, if the student first received a new award before the 2022–23 award year.

(f) It is the intent of the Legislature that independent institutions of higher education
 make a good faith effort to make the process for transferring from the California Community Colleges easier for resident students and a decision determining the maximum award amounts made pursuant to this section for students attending an independent institution of higher education will be made with consideration of the effort of the institution to make that process easier.

(g) The association representing the largest number of independent institutions of higher education shall submit a report relative to the implementation of this section to the Department of Finance and the Legislature, in conformity with Section 9795 of the Government Code, on or before April 15 of each year.

(h) (1) For the 2024–25 award year and each award year thereafter, the target number of new unduplicated recipients accepted by independent institutions of higher education who have
 been given associate degree for transfer commitments shall be equal to the number of new transfer students attending independent institutions of higher education who were given associate degree for transfer commitments in the prior award year, adjusted by the percentage change in the total number of new transfer students from the year two years prior, compared to the prior year.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), it is the intent of the Legislature that the target number of new unduplicated recipients accepted by independent institutions of higher education who have been given associate degree for transfer commitments will increase each year.

(i) For purposes of this section, “independent institution of higher education” has the same meaning as in Section 66010.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 79, Sec. 8.   (SB 135)   Effective July 13, 2026.   Conditionally inoperative as prescribed in Section 69475 (if it becomes operative).    Repealed conditionally pursuant to Section 69475 (if it becomes operative).)
-------------------------------------------

69432.5.

The Budget required by the California Constitution to be submitted by the Governor at each Regular Session of the Legislature shall take into consideration the amount of federal grant funds for student financial aid.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 403, Sec. 4.   Effective September 12, 2000.   Conditionally inoperative as prescribed in Section 69475 (if it becomes operative).   Repealed conditionally pursuant to Section 69475 (if it becomes operative).)
-------------------------------------------

69432.7.

As used in this chapter, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) An “academic year” is July 1 to June 30, inclusive. The starting date of a session shall determine the academic year in which it is included.

(b) “Access costs” means living expenses and expenses for transportation, supplies, technology, and books.

(c) “Award year” means one academic year, or the equivalent, of attendance at a qualifying institution.

(d) “College grade point average” and “community college grade point average” mean a grade point average calculated on the basis of all college work completed, except
 for nontransferable units and courses not counted in the computation for admission to a California public institution of higher education that grants a baccalaureate degree.

(e) “Commission” means the Student Aid Commission.

(f) “Enrollment status” means part- or full-time status.

(1) “Part time,” for purposes of Cal Grant eligibility, means 6 to 11 semester units, inclusive, or the equivalent.

(2) “Full time,” for purposes of Cal Grant eligibility, means 12 or more semester units or the equivalent.

(g) “Expected family contribution,” with respect to an applicant, shall be determined using the federal methodology pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 69506 (as established by Title IV of
 the federal Higher Education Act of 1965, as amended (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1070 et seq.)) and applicable rules and regulations adopted by the commission.

(h) “High school grade point average” means a grade point average calculated on a 4.0 scale, using all academic coursework, for the sophomore year, the summer following the sophomore year, the junior year, and the summer following the junior year, excluding physical education, Reserve Officers’ Training Corps (ROTC), and remedial courses, and computed pursuant to regulations of the commission. However, for high school graduates who apply after their senior year, “high school grade point average” includes senior year coursework.

(i) “Instructional program of not less than one academic year” means a program of study that results in the award of an associate or baccalaureate degree or certificate requiring at least 24 semester units or
 the equivalent, or that results in eligibility for transfer from a community college to a baccalaureate degree program.

(j) “Instructional program of not less than two academic years” means a program of study that results in the award of an associate or baccalaureate degree requiring at least 48 semester units or the equivalent, or that results in eligibility for transfer from a community college to a baccalaureate degree program.

(k) (1) “Maximum household income and asset levels” means the applicable household income and household asset levels for participants, including new applicants and renewing recipients, in the Cal Grant Program, as defined and adopted in regulations by the commission for the 2001–02 academic year, which shall be set pursuant to the following income and asset ceiling amounts:
CAL GRANT PROGRAM INCOME CEILINGS
Cal Grant A,
 C, and TCal Grant BDependent and Independent students with dependents*Family Size Six or more$74,100 $40,700 Five$68,700 $37,700 Four$64,100 $33,700 Three$59,000 $30,300 Two$57,600 $26,900 
 Independent
 Single, no dependents$23,500 $23,500 Married$26,900 $26,900 *Applies to independent students with dependents other than a 
spouse.CAL GRANT PROGRAM ASSET CEILINGS
Cal Grant A,
 C, and TCal Grant B
 Dependent**
$49,600 
$49,600 Independent$23,600 $23,600 **Applies to independent students with dependents other than a 
spouse.

 

(2) The commission shall annually adjust the maximum household income and asset levels based on the percentage change in the cost of living within the meaning of paragraph (1) of subdivision (e) of Section 8 of Article XIIIB of the California Constitution. The maximum household income and asset levels applicable to a renewing recipient shall be the greater of the adjusted maximum household income and asset levels or the maximum household income
 and asset levels at the time of the renewing recipient’s initial Cal Grant award. For a recipient who was initially awarded a Cal Grant for an academic year before the 2011–12 academic year, the maximum household income and asset levels shall be the greater of the adjusted maximum household income and asset levels or the 2010–11 academic year maximum household income and asset levels. An applicant or renewal recipient who qualifies to be considered under the simplified needs test established by federal law for student assistance shall be presumed to meet the asset level test under this section. Before disbursing any Cal Grant funds, a qualifying institution shall be obligated, under the terms of its institutional participation agreement with the commission, to resolve any conflicts that may exist in the data the institution possesses relating to that individual.

(l) (1) “Qualifying institution” means an institution
 that complies with paragraphs (2) to (4), inclusive, and is any of the following:

(A) A California private or independent postsecondary educational institution that participates in the Pell Grant Program and in at least two of the following federal student aid programs:

(i) Federal Work-Study Program.

(ii) Federal Stafford Loan Program.

(iii) Federal Supplemental Educational Opportunity Grant Program.

(B) A nonprofit institution headquartered and operating in California that certifies to the commission that 10 percent of the institution’s operating budget, as demonstrated in an audited financial statement, is expended for purposes of institutionally funded student financial aid in the form
 of grants, that demonstrates to the commission that it has the administrative capacity to administer the funds, that is accredited by the Western Association of Schools and Colleges, and that meets any other state-required criteria adopted by regulation by the commission in consultation with the Department of Finance. A regionally accredited institution that was deemed qualified by the commission to participate in the Cal Grant Program for the 2000–01 academic year shall retain its eligibility as long as it maintains its existing accreditation status.

(C) A California public postsecondary educational institution.

(2) (A) The institution shall provide information on where to access California license examination passage rates for the most recent available year from graduates of its undergraduate programs leading to employment for which passage of a California
 licensing examination is required, if that data is electronically available through the internet website of a California licensing or regulatory agency. For purposes of this paragraph, “provide” may exclusively include placement of an internet website address labeled as an access point for the data on the passage rates of recent program graduates on the internet website where enrollment information is also located, on an internet website that provides centralized admissions information for postsecondary educational systems with multiple campuses, or on applications for enrollment or other program information distributed to prospective students.

(B) The institution shall be responsible for certifying to the commission compliance with the requirements of subparagraph (A).

(3) (A) The commission shall certify by November 1 of each year the institution’s latest
 official three-year cohort default rate and graduation rate as most recently reported by the United States Department of Education. For purposes of this section, the graduation rate is the percentage of full-time, first-time degree or certificate-seeking undergraduate students who graduate in 150 percent or less of the expected time to complete degree requirements as most recently reported publicly in any format, including preliminary data records, by the United States Department of Education.

(B) For purposes of the 2011–12 academic year, an otherwise qualifying institution with a three-year cohort default rate reported by the United States Department of Education that is equal to or greater than 24.6 percent shall be ineligible for initial and renewal Cal Grant awards at the institution.

(C) For purposes of the 2012–13 academic year, and every academic year thereafter, an
 otherwise qualifying institution with a three-year cohort default rate that is equal to or greater than 15.5 percent, as certified by the commission on October 1, 2011, and every year thereafter, shall be ineligible for initial and renewal Cal Grant awards at the institution.

(D) (i) An otherwise qualifying institution that becomes ineligible under this paragraph for initial and renewal Cal Grant awards shall regain its eligibility for the academic year for which it satisfies the requirements established in subparagraph (B), (C), or (F), as applicable.

(ii) If the United States Department of Education corrects or revises an institution’s three-year cohort default rate or graduation rate that originally failed to satisfy the requirements established in subparagraph (B), (C), or (F), as applicable, and the correction or revision results in the institution’s
 three-year cohort default rate or graduation rate satisfying those requirements, that institution shall immediately regain its eligibility for the academic year to which the corrected or revised three-year cohort default rate or graduation rate would have been applied.

(E) An otherwise qualifying institution for which no three-year cohort default rate or graduation rate has been reported by the United States Department of Education shall be provisionally eligible to participate in the Cal Grant Program until a three-year cohort default rate or graduation rate has been reported for the institution by the United States Department of Education.

(F) For purposes of the 2012–13 academic year, and every academic year thereafter, an otherwise qualifying institution with a graduation rate of 30 percent or less, as certified by the commission pursuant to subparagraph (A), shall be
 ineligible for initial and renewal Cal Grant awards at the institution, except as provided for in subparagraph (H).

(G) Notwithstanding any other law, the requirements of this paragraph shall not apply to institutions with 40 percent or less of undergraduate students borrowing federal student loans, using information reported to the United States Department of Education for the academic year two years before the academic year in which the commission is certifying the three-year cohort default rate or graduation rate pursuant to subparagraph (A).

(H) Notwithstanding subparagraph (F), an otherwise qualifying institution that maintains a three-year cohort default rate that is less than 15.5 percent and a graduation rate above 20 percent for students taking 150 percent or less of the expected time to complete degree requirements, as certified by the commission pursuant to subparagraph
 (A), shall be eligible for initial and renewal Cal Grant awards at the institution through the 2016–17 academic year.

(I) Notwithstanding subparagraph (D), for the 2024–25 academic year, the commission shall use the three-year cohort default rate certified in 2020 to certify an otherwise qualifying institution pursuant to this paragraph.

(J) Notwithstanding subparagraph (D), for the 2025–26 and 2026–27 academic years, the commission shall use the three-year cohort default rate certified in 2020 to certify an otherwise qualifying institution pursuant to this paragraph.

(K) The commission shall do all of the following:

(i) Notify initial Cal Grant recipients seeking to attend, or attending, an institution that is ineligible for initial and renewal Cal Grant awards under subparagraph (C) or (F) that the institution is ineligible for initial Cal Grant awards for the academic year for which the student received an initial Cal Grant award.

(ii) Notify renewal Cal Grant recipients attending an institution that is ineligible for initial and renewal Cal Grant awards at the institution under subparagraph (C) or (F) that the student’s Cal Grant award will be reduced by 20 percent, or eliminated, as appropriate, if the student attends the ineligible institution in an academic year in which
 the institution is ineligible.

(iii) Provide initial and renewal Cal Grant recipients seeking to attend, or attending, an institution that is ineligible for initial and renewal Cal Grant awards at the institution under subparagraph (C) or (F) with a complete list of all California postsecondary educational institutions at which the student would be eligible to receive an unreduced Cal Grant award.

(iv) (I) Establish an appeal process for an otherwise qualifying institution that fails to satisfy the three-year cohort default rate and graduation rate requirements in subparagraphs (C) and (F), respectively.

(II) The commission may grant an appeal for an academic year only if the commission has determined the institution has a cohort size of 20 individuals or less and the cohort is not
 representative of the overall institutional performance.

(4) By the start of the 2024–25 academic year, the institution shall develop and implement policies defining “satisfactory academic progress” in a manner that is consistent with the federal standards published in Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations. The institution shall also comply with all of the following requirements:

(A) Set the standards for grade point average and pace of completion at the minimum federal standards as determined by Section 668.34(a) of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(B) Provide information to students about the institution’s “satisfactory academic progress” standards and financial aid appeals process during new student orientation and include student-friendly language on the institution’s internet website and
 financial aid award letters regarding the standards and appeals process. The institution shall request its faculty to include student-friendly language on course syllabi regarding the standards and appeals process.

(C) Notify a student when the student has not achieved the “satisfactory academic progress” standards following every term of enrollment, regardless of the frequency at which “satisfactory academic progress” is formally evaluated. This subparagraph does not preclude an institution from conducting the formal evaluation annually.

(D) Evaluate whether a student satisfies the grade point average and pace of completion standards set forth in subparagraph (A) based on cumulative measures. An institution shall not require a student to satisfy the minimum grade point average and pace of completion standards for each individual term. This paragraph does not preclude an
 institution from requiring a student on “financial aid probation” as defined by Section 668.34(b) of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations to comply with the terms of the student’s academic plan in order to maintain financial aid eligibility.

(E) Exclude remedial coursework from maximum timeframe calculations if the institution offers remedial coursework.

(F) Allow a student who fulfills the terms and conditions of the student’s academic plan to remain on “financial aid probation” as defined by Section 668.34(b) of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations, including continuing to receive financial aid for any term for which the student fulfills the terms and conditions of the student’s academic plan.

(G) In the case of a “satisfactory academic progress” determination for a transfer student, when calculating
 maximum timeframe as defined by Section 668.34(b) of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations, only include those credits from other institutions that count towards the student’s current program of study.

(H) Accept both electronic and hard copy financial aid appeals for any student who is ineligible to receive financial aid due to the determination that the student did not meet “satisfactory academic progress,” as defined by the institution where the student is enrolled, subject to all of the following:

(i) A student who loses financial aid eligibility may appeal the determination during any subsequent term following loss of financial aid eligibility. The institution shall not limit the total number of appeals that may be submitted by a student throughout the duration of the student’s enrollment. The institution may limit the number of appeals per term, but each appeal that is
 denied shall be subject to the second review process pursuant to clause (vi). The institution shall not impose deadlines for submitting an appeal that are earlier than three weeks before the end of each term.

(ii) A student who previously disenrolled while being ineligible to receive financial aid may appeal the loss of financial aid upon reenrollment, and the timing for consideration of the appeal shall allow the student, if the student meets the criteria for financial aid reinstatement, to qualify for reinstatement upon the first term of reenrollment.

(iii) The institution shall provide a student who is ineligible to receive financial aid with written notice of the financial aid appeals process, including the process for a student to file an appeal, information about the second review process for an appeal that is denied as described in clause (vi), and how a student may request
 a second review.

(iv) In reviewing a student’s appeal, the institution may consider any additional special circumstances that the institution deems appropriate, and shall consider a broad range of special circumstances, including, but not limited to, any of the following:

(I) Death of a relative or other significant person.

(II) Injury or illness, including, but not limited to, behavioral health conditions, of the student or a relative or other significant person.

(III) Pregnancy or birth of a child.

(IV) Homelessness.

(V) Loss of childcare.

(VI) Loss or change
 in employment.

(VII) Loss of access to personal or public transportation.

(VIII) Being a victim of a serious crime, including, but not limited to, domestic abuse, even if the crime was not reported or did not result in criminal prosecution or civil liability.

(IX) Natural disaster.

(X) Change of major.

(v) The institution shall review a student’s appeal and notify the student of the appeal decision within 45 days of submission of a complete appeal. The institution shall not disenroll a student for nonpayment of tuition and fees while the student’s appeal is pending.

(vi) The institution shall provide a second review process
 for an appeal that is denied if requested by the student. The second review shall be conducted by a reviewer who did not participate in the first review.

(vii) The institution shall waive any requirement for third-party written documentation of the special circumstances forming the basis of an appeal if that documentation cannot be reasonably obtained by the student and the student signs a statement attesting to the veracity of the special circumstances presented as the grounds for appeal.

(viii) This subparagraph shall not be interpreted to require institutions to provide retroactive financial aid for a term preceding the term in which a student reenrolls.

(m) “Satisfactory academic progress” means those criteria required by applicable federal standards published in Title 34 of the Code of Federal
 Regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 9, Sec. 4.   (AB 123)   Effective June 27, 2025.   Conditionally inoperative as prescribed in Section 69475 (if it becomes operative).    Repealed conditionally pursuant to Section 69475 (if it becomes operative).)
-------------------------------------------

69432.8.

The commission may determine that an advance payment is essential to ensure that funds provided pursuant to this chapter to assist students to enroll in postsecondary education are available at the time students enroll. Upon making that determination, the commission may, on the basis of institutional academic calendars, advance, per term to authorized postsecondary educational institutions, the funds for eligible students who have indicated they will attend those institutions, less an amount based on historical claim enrollment attrition information. Each institution shall disburse the funds in accordance with the provisions set forth in the institutional agreement between the commission and the institution.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 403, Sec. 4.   Effective September 12, 2000.   Conditionally inoperative as prescribed in Section 69475 (if it becomes operative).   Repealed conditionally pursuant to Section 69475 (if it becomes operative).)
-------------------------------------------

69432.9.

(a) A Cal Grant applicant shall submit a complete official financial aid application pursuant to Section 69433 and applicable regulations adopted by the commission. Each pupil enrolled in grade 12 in a California public school, including a charter school, other than pupils who opt out as provided in subdivision (d), shall be deemed to be a Cal Grant applicant.

(b) Financial need shall be determined to establish an applicant’s initial eligibility for a Cal Grant award and a renewing recipient’s continued eligibility using the federal financial need methodology pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 69506 and applicable regulations adopted by the commission, and as established by Title IV of the federal Higher Education Act of 1965, as amended (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1070
 et seq.).

(1) “Expected family contribution,” with respect to an applicant or renewing recipient, shall be determined using the federal methodology pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 69506 (as established by Title IV of the federal Higher Education Act of 1965, as amended (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1070 et seq.)) and applicable rules and regulations adopted by the commission.

(2) “Financial need” means the difference between the student’s cost of attendance as determined by the commission and the expected family contribution. The calculation of financial need shall be consistent with Title IV of the federal Higher Education Act of 1965, as amended (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1070 et seq.).

(3) (A) The minimum financial need required for receipt of an initial and renewal Cal Grant A or C award shall be no less than
 the maximum annual award value for the applicable institution, plus an additional one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500) of financial need.

(B) The minimum financial need required for receipt of an initial and renewal Cal Grant B award shall be no less than seven hundred dollars ($700).

(4) Notwithstanding paragraphs (2) and (3), for the 2020–21 and 2021–22 award years, a student with an initial or renewal Cal Grant A award impacted by a change in the student’s living status, from living on-campus to living off-campus or from living on-campus to living at home, due to the COVID-19 pandemic, shall have the student’s eligibility for the initial or renewal Cal Grant A award calculated based on what it would have been had the change in the student’s living status due to the COVID-19 pandemic not occurred.

(c) (1) The commission shall require that a grade point average be submitted to it for all Cal Grant A and B applicants, except for those permitted to provide test scores in lieu of a grade point average or as provided in subclause (II) of clause (iii) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2).

(2) (A) Upon implementation of transcript-informed accounts for pupils in grades 9 to 12, inclusive, on the CaliforniaColleges.edu platform, the commission shall require that any grade point average data required for eligibility for student financial aid programs be submitted by local educational agencies through the California College Guidance Initiative established by Section 60900.5.

(B) (i) The commission shall require that a grade point average be submitted to it electronically on a standardized form for all
 grade 12 pupils at public schools, including charter schools, no later than October 1 of each academic year, except for pupils who have opted out as provided in subdivision (d). Social security numbers shall not be included in the information submitted to the commission. However, if the commission determines that a social security number is required to complete the application for financial aid, the school, school district, or charter school may obtain permission from the parent or guardian of the pupil, or the pupil, if the pupil is 18 years of age, to submit the pupil’s social security number to the commission.

(ii) The commission shall require that each report of a grade point average include a certification, executed under penalty of perjury, by a school official, that the grade point average reported is accurately reported. The certification shall include a statement that it is subject to review by the commission or its designee.

(iii) (I) The commission shall adopt regulations that establish a grace period for receipt of the grade point average and any appropriate corrections, and that set forth the circumstances under which a student may submit a specified test score designated by the commission, by regulation, in lieu of submitting a qualifying grade point average.

(II) Notwithstanding subclause (I), for the 2021–22 award year, commission staff may waive the requirement to submit a test score in lieu of a qualifying grade point average for a student who does not have a grade point average and is unable to submit a test score due to unavailability of designated testing due to the COVID-19 pandemic. The commission shall require a student seeking a waiver under this subclause to submit a signed certification verifying they were prevented from taking and submitting a test score in lieu of
 a qualifying grade point average due to the COVID-19 pandemic. For purposes of consideration for a Cal Grant A or B Entitlement award when applying with a waiver under this subclause for the 2021–22 award year, students shall have until May 16, 2021, to complete and submit their financial aid application and signed certification verifying they were prevented from taking and submitting a test score in lieu of a qualifying grade point average.

(iv) The requirements of this subparagraph shall become inoperative upon the submission by the commission of any required grade point average through the Cradle-to-Career Data System pursuant to subparagraph (A).

(3) It is the intent of the Legislature that high schools and institutions of higher education certify the grade point averages of their students in time to meet the application deadlines imposed by this chapter.

(4) (A) It is the intent of the Legislature that the commission make available to each high school and school district a report identifying all grade 12 pupils within the high school or school district, respectively, who have and have not completed the Free Application for Federal Student Aid or the California Dream Act application.

(B) The requirements of this paragraph shall become inoperative upon the submission by the local educational agency of any required grade point average through the Cradle-to-Career Data System pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2).

(d) (1) The school district or charter school shall, no later than January 1 of a pupil’s grade 11 academic year, notify, in writing, each grade 11 pupil and, for a pupil under 18 years of age, the pupil’s parent
 or guardian that, pursuant to subdivision (a), the pupil will be deemed a Cal Grant applicant unless the pupil opts out within a period of time specified in the notice, which shall not be less than 30 days. The required notice shall indicate when the school will first send grade point averages to the commission and the submission deadline of October 1. The school district or charter school shall provide an opportunity for the pupil to opt out of being automatically deemed a Cal Grant applicant.

(2) Until a pupil turns 18 years of age, only a parent or guardian may opt the pupil out. Once a pupil turns 18 years of age, only the pupil may opt the pupil out and, if before the conclusion of the notice period, the pupil may opt in over the prior decision of a parent or guardian to opt out.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 38, Sec. 91.   (SB 153)   Effective June 29, 2024.   Conditionally inoperative as prescribed in Section 69475 (if it becomes operative).    Repealed conditionally pursuant to Section 69475 (if it becomes operative).)
-------------------------------------------

69432.92.

(a) The commission may require verification of high school graduation or its equivalent to be electronically submitted for all former grade 12 pupils who graduated from public schools, including charter schools, in the prior academic year, except for pupils who have opted out as provided in subdivision (d) of Section 69432.9.

(b) If the commission requires verification of high school graduation or its equivalent pursuant to subdivision (a), the commission shall provide guidance to high schools or high school districts to ensure that high schools and high school districts verify the graduation of their pupils as soon as possible upon a pupil’s graduation and
 no later than August 31 of the academic year following the pupils’ graduation. This subdivision also applies to pupils who graduate during the summer following the grade 12 academic year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 351, Sec. 1.   (AB 2056)   Effective January 1, 2017.   Conditionally inoperative as prescribed in Section 69475 (if it becomes operative).   Repealed conditionally pursuant to Section 69475 (if it becomes operative).)